Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXXIX Provisional Remedies, Enforcement of Judgments, and Exemptions
Writ of Possession

425.011.
Motion for writ of possession — Required allegations.

Upon filing of the complaint or at any time prior to judgment, in an action to recover the possession of specific personal property, the plaintiff may apply pursuant to this chapter for a writ of possession by filing a written motion for the writ with the court in which the action is brought.

The motion shall be executed under oath and shall include all of the following:

A showing of the basis of the plaintiff’s claim and that the plaintiff is entitled to possession of the property claimed. If the basis of the plaintiff’s claim is a written instrument, a copy of the instrument shall be attached.

A showing that the property is wrongfully detained by the defendant, of the manner in which the defendant came into possession of the property, and, according to the best knowledge, information, and belief of the plaintiff the reason for the detention.

A particular description of the property and a statement of its value. A description of property sufficient under KRS

355.9-108

shall meet the requirement of this section. The statement of value may be as to the worth of the property as a whole.

A statement, according to the best knowledge, information and belief of the plaintiff, of the location of the property and if the property, or some part of it, is within a private place which may have to be entered to take possession a showing that there is probable cause to believe that such property is located there. Although such showing may be based on information and belief the judicial officer at the hearing herein provided must be presented with facts sufficient to show that the information and the informant are credible and reliable.

A statement that the property has not been taken for a tax assessment, or fine, pursuant to a statute; or seized under an execution against the property of the plaintiff; or if so seized, that it is by statute exempt from such seizure.

The requirements of subsection (2) of this section may be satisfied by one (1) or more affidavits filed with the application.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976, ch. 91, § 2; 1984, ch. 158, § 1, effective July 13, 1984; 2000, ch. 408, § 185, effective July 1, 2001.

425.012.
Writ of possession.

Before a writ of possession shall be issued by the clerk, the person seeking the writ must first make a demand in writing at or after the time the suit is filed, by delivering such demand and a copy of the complaint, motion and summons to the defendant or by sending them to him by registered or certified mail, return receipt requested, to the last known place of residence, at least seven (7) and not more than sixty (60) days before such order is sought. The demand shall contain a statement in substance that the defendant has seven (7) days in which to petition the court for a hearing or in which to pay the amount claimed in the complaint in full, and that unless a hearing is set or the amount paid, a writ of possession will issue. The statement shall identify the court in which the suit has been filed, the grounds therefor, the date of the demand, the amount claimed, and the name and address of the plaintiff and his attorney. An affidavit of the plaintiff or his attorney evidencing compliance with this subsection shall be filed before a writ shall be issued.

The writ of possession shall be issued by the clerk upon compliance with subsection (1) of this section unless the defendant has requested a hearing, in which case a hearing shall be conducted pursuant to KRS

425.031

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1978, ch. 399, § 5, effective June 17, 1978; repealed and reenact., Acts 1980, ch. 188, § 296, effective July 15, 1980.

425.015.
Order not to issue until bond executed. [Repealed.]

425.016.
Issuance of writ. [Repealed.]

425.020.
Form and contents of order of arrest. [Repealed.]

425.021.
Service of pleadings on defendant. [Repealed.]

425.025.
Return day of order. [Repealed.]

425.026.
Writ of ne exeat abolished. [Repealed.]

425.027.
Notice of application and hearing. [Repealed.]

425.030.
Execution of order. [Repealed.]

425.031.
Conduct of hearing.

Upon request of a defendant or intervening party, the judicial officer shall conduct a hearing at which each party shall be provided the opportunity to present witnesses on his behalf and to cross-examine adverse witnesses. The parties shall have the right to compel the attendance of witnesses by subpoena and to be represented at the hearing by counsel. The judicial officer shall make his determination upon the evidence adduced at the hearing.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976, ch. 91, § 6; 1984, ch. 158, § 2, effective July 13, 1984.

Research References and Practice Aids

Kentucky Law Journal.

Kentucky Law Survey, Mapother, the Constitutionality of Kentucky’s Prejudgment Seizure Law, 68 Ky. L.J. 557 (1979-1980).

Treatises

Caldwell’s Kentucky Form Book, 5th Ed., Practice Context for Attachment and Garnishment, § 150.00.

Caldwell’s Kentucky Form Book, 5th Ed., Practice Context for Writ of Possession, § 152.00.

Kentucky Instructions To Juries (Civil), 5th Ed., Abuse of Legal Process, § 27.06.

425.035.
Commitment of defendant to jail unless bailed — Discharge. [Repealed.]

425.036.
Issuance of writ of possession.

At the hearing, the judicial officer shall issue a writ of possession if he finds both of the following:

The plaintiff has established the probable validity of his claim to possession of the property; and

The plaintiff has provided a bond as required by KRS

425.111

.

No writ directing the levying officer to enter a private place to take possession of any property shall be issued unless the plaintiff has established that there is probable cause to believe that such property is located there.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976, ch. 91, § 7.

Research References and Practice Aids

Kentucky Law Journal.

Kentucky Law Survey, Mapother, the Constitutionality of Kentucky’s Prejudgment Seizure Law, 68 Ky. L.J. 557 (1979-1980).

Treatises

Caldwell’s Kentucky Form Book, 5th Ed., Plaintiff’s Bond on Writ of Possession and Temporary Restraining Order, Form 152.16.

425.040.
Deposit, custody and disposition of money in lieu of bail — Liability of sheriff. [Repealed.]

425.041.
Order transferring possession.

If a writ of possession is issued, the judicial officer may also issue an order directing the defendant to transfer possession of the property to the plaintiff.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976, ch. 91, § 8.

Research References and Practice Aids

Kentucky Bench & Bar.

Mapother, Prejudgment Seizure — Practice and Procedure in Kentucky, Vol. 42, No. 3, October 1978, Ky. Bench & Bar 12.

Treatises

Caldwell’s Kentucky Form Book, 5th Ed., Order Transferring Possession, Form 152.10.

Caldwell’s Kentucky Form Book, 5th Ed., Order Transferring Possession (Another Form), Form 152.111.

Caldwell’s Kentucky Form Book, 5th Ed., Plaintiff’s Bond on Writ of Possession and Order Transferring Possession, Form 152.14.

Caldwell’s Kentucky Form Book, 5th Ed., Verified Motion for Writ of Possession and Order Transferring Possession, Form 152.05.

Caldwell’s Kentucky Form Book, 5th Ed., Verified Motion for Writ of Possession and Temporary Restraining Order, Form 152.06.

425.045.
When bail may be given — Contents of bond — Discharge of defendant. [Repealed.]

425.046.
Requirements of writ of possession.

The writ of possession shall meet all of the following requirements:

The writ shall be directed to the sheriff;

The writ shall describe the specific property to be seized in accordance with KRS 425.011(2)(c);

The writ shall specify any private place that may be entered to take possession of the property or some part of it; and

The writ shall direct the sheriff to levy on the property pursuant to KRS

425.091

if found and to retain it in his custody until released or sold pursuant to KRS

425.101

.

The writ shall inform the defendant that he has the right to obtain redelivery of the property by filing a bond with one (1) or more sufficient sureties as prescribed by KRS

425.116

or that he has the right to except to the sureties upon the plaintiff’s bond, a copy of which shall be attached to the writ.

The writ may at any time before judgment be directed to any county for the delivery of the property claimed.

The writ shall inform the defendant of his right to seek an order from the court, under KRS

425.081

, to quash the writ and seek a release of the property seized.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976, ch. 91, § 9; 1984, ch. 158, § 3, effective July 13, 1984.

Opinions of Attorney General.

The Legislature designed KRS

454.145

to enable a court, where the interest of justice and the orderly working of the court demand, to resort to the appointment of a special bailiff to serve a particular and specifically designated process in that particular case only, instead of the court’s having to resort to the application of KRS

454.140

or subdivision (1)(a) of this section; thus, where the court has, in its discretion as described above, appointed a special bailiff under KRS

454.145

to serve a writ of possession, that special bailiff then has the authority to so serve the writ of possession, as required under this chapter.

OAG 84-366

.

Research References and Practice Aids

Kentucky Bench & Bar.

Mapother, Kentucky’s New Prejudgment Seizure Law, Vol. 40, No. 3, July 1976, Ky. Bench & Bar 20.

Treatises

Caldwell’s Kentucky Form Book, 5th Ed., Practice Context for Writ of Possession, § 152.00.

425.050.
Qualifications of bail. [Repealed.]

425.051.
Ex parte motion — Endorsement.

The plaintiff may apply ex parte in writing to the court in which the action was brought for an endorsement on the writ directing the sheriff to seize the property at a private place not specified in the writ.

The judicial officer shall make the endorsement if the plaintiff establishes by affidavit that there is probable cause to believe that the property or some part of it may be found at that place.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976, ch. 91, § 10.

425.055.
Objections to sufficiency of bail. [Repealed.]

425.056.
Effect of failure of defendant to oppose writ or rebut evidence.

Neither the failure of the defendant to oppose the issuance of a writ of possession under this chapter nor his failure to rebut any evidence produced by the plaintiff in connection with proceedings under this chapter shall constitute a waiver of any defense to plaintiff’s claim in the action or any other action or have any effect on the right of the defendant to produce or exclude evidence at the trial of any such action.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976, ch. 91, § 11.

425.060.
Exoneration of officer from liability. [Repealed.]

425.061.
Effect of determinations of judicial officer.

The determinations of the judicial officer under this chapter shall have no effect on the determination of any issues in the action other than the issues relevant to proceedings under this chapter, nor shall they affect the rights of any party in any other action arising out of the same claim. The determinations of the judicial officer under this chapter shall not be given in evidence nor referred to in the trial of any such action.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976, ch. 91, § 12.

425.065.
Proceedings if bail adjudged insufficient. [Repealed.]

425.066.
Temporary restraining order — Preliminary injunction.

At or after the time he files his motion for writ of possession, the plaintiff may apply for a temporary restraining order by setting forth in the motion a statement of grounds justifying the issuance of such order.

The judicial officer may issue a temporary restraining order if he determines that plaintiff’s motion for writ of possession shows the probability that there is an immediate danger that the property claimed may become unavailable to levy by reason of being transferred, concealed, or removed or may become substantially impaired in value.

If at the hearing on issuance of the writ of possession the judicial officer determines that the plaintiff is not entitled to a writ of possession, the judicial officer shall dissolve any temporary restraining order; otherwise, he may issue a preliminary injunction to remain in effect until the property claimed is seized pursuant to the writ of possession.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976, ch. 91, § 13.

Research References and Practice Aids

Kentucky Law Journal.

Kentucky Law Survey, Mapother, the Constitutionality of Kentucky’s Prejudgment Seizure Law, 68 Ky. L.J. 557 (1979-1980).

Treatises

Caldwell’s Kentucky Form Book, 5th Ed., Practice Context for Injunctions, § 156.00.

Caldwell’s Kentucky Form Book, 5th Ed., Verified Motion for Writ of Possession and Temporary Restraining Order, Form 152.06.

Caldwell’s Kentucky Form Book, 5th Ed., Temporary Restraining Order, Form 152.12.

Caldwell’s Kentucky Form Book, 5th Ed., Motion for Restraining Order, Form 253.49.

Caldwell’s Kentucky Form Book, 5th Ed., Affidavit for Restraining Order, Form 253.50.

425.070.
Execution against the person — Oath of insolvency. [Repealed.]

425.071.
Prohibitions by temporary restraining order.

In the discretion of the judicial officer, the temporary restraining order may prohibit the defendant from doing any of the following:

Transferring any interest in the property by sale, pledge, or grant of security interest, or otherwise disposing of or encumbering, the property. If the property is farm products held for sale or lease or is inventory, the order may not prohibit the defendant from transferring the property in the ordinary course of business, but the order may impose appropriate restrictions on the disposition of the proceeds from such transfer.

Concealing or otherwise removing the property in such a manner as to make it less available to seizure by the levying officer.

Impairing the value of the property either by acts of destruction or by failure to care for the property in a reasonable manner.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976, ch. 91, § 14.

Research References and Practice Aids

Kentucky Law Journal.

Kentucky Law Survey, Mapother, the Constitutionality of Kentucky’s Prejudgment Seizure Law, 68 Ky. L.J. 557 (1979-1980).

Treatises

Caldwell’s Kentucky Form Book, 5th Ed., Verified Motion for Writ of Possession and Temporary Restraining Order, Form 152.06.

Caldwell’s Kentucky Form Book, 5th Ed., Temporary Restraining Order, Form 152.12.

425.075.
Discharge of bail upon surrender of defendant. [Repealed.]

425.076.
Issuance of ex parte writ of possession.

A judicial officer, except as otherwise provided by statute, shall not issue an ex parte writ of possession unless it appears from facts shown by affidavit that great or irreparable injury would result to the plaintiff if issuance of the writ were delayed until the matter could be heard on notice.

The requirement of subsection (1) is satisfied if any of the following are known:

A danger that the property sought to be attached would be concealed or placed beyond the process of the court or substantially impaired in value if issuance of the order were delayed until the matter could be heard on notice.

The defendant gained possession of the property by wrongfully taking the property from the plaintiff. This provision shall not apply when the defendant has fraudulently appropriated property entrusted to him or obtained possession by false pretense or by embezzlement.

The property is a credit card.

Any other circumstances showing that great or irreparable injury would result to the plaintiff if issuance of the writ were delayed until the matter could be heard on notice.

The plaintiff’s motion for the writ shall satisfy the requirements of KRS

425.011

and in addition shall include a showing that the conditions required by this section exist. The judicial officer may issue a writ of possession if he finds that the conditions required by this section exist and the requirements of KRS

425.036

are met. Where a writ of possession has been issued pursuant to this section, a copy of the summons and complaint, a copy of the motion for the writ of possession and any affidavit in support thereof shall be served upon persons required by KRS

425.096

to be served with a writ of possession.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976, ch. 91, § 15.

Notes to Decisions

Cited in:

Farmers Deposit Bank v. Ripato, 760 S.W.2d 396, 1988

Ky. LEXIS 59

(

Ky. 1988

).

Research References and Practice Aids

Kentucky Bench & Bar.

Mapother, Kentucky’s New Prejudgment Seizure Law, Vol. 40, No. 3, July 1976, Ky. Bench & Bar 20.

Mapother, Prejudgment Seizure — Practice and Procedure in Kentucky, Vol. 42, No. 3, October 1978, Ky. Bench & Bar 12.

Mapother, Prejudgment Seizure — Part II, Vol. 43, No. 2, April 1979, Ky. Bench & Bar 23.

Kentucky Law Journal.

Kentucky Law Survey, Mapother, the Constitutionality of Kentucky’s Prejudgment Seizure Law, 68 Ky. L.J. 557 (1979-1980).

425.080.
Arrest of defendant for purpose of surrender. [Repealed.]

425.081.
Motion to quash writ.

Any defendant whose property has been taken pursuant to a writ of possession issued under this chapter may apply for an order that the writ be quashed and any property levied on pursuant to the writ be released. Such application shall be made by noticed motion and the provisions of KRS

425.031

.

Pending the hearing on the defendant’s motion the judicial officer may order that delivery pursuant to KRS

425.101

of any property previously levied upon be stayed. If the judicial officer determines that the plaintiff is not entitled to a writ of possession, he shall quash the writ of possession and order the release of any property previously levied upon.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976, ch. 91, § 16; 1984, ch. 158, § 4, effective July 13, 1984.

Research References and Practice Aids

Treatises

Caldwell’s Kentucky Form Book, 5th Ed., Practice Context for Writ of Possession, § 152.00.

Caldwell’s Kentucky Form Book, 5th Ed., Writ of Possession, Form 152.09.

425.085.
When liability of bail becomes fixed — Amount — Action against bail. [Repealed.]

425.086.
Issuance of temporary restraining order in lieu of writ of possession — Effect.

In any case where the plaintiff has made a motion for a writ of possession under KRS

425.076

the court may in its discretion deny the motion for the writ and issue instead a temporary restraining order under this chapter if it determines that the requirements of subsection (3) of KRS

425.076

are satisfied but that the issuance of the temporary restraining order instead of the writ of possession would be in the interest of justice and equity to the parties, taking into account the effect on the defendant of issuing a writ of possession ex parte, the effect on the plaintiff of issuing the temporary restraining order instead of the writ and other factors that bear on equity and justice under the circumstances of the particular case.

If the court issues a temporary restraining order under this section, the plaintiff’s motion for a writ of possession shall be treated as a motion for a writ of possession under KRS

425.011

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976, ch. 91, § 17.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(1988). A technical correction has been made in this section by the Reviser of Statutes pursuant to
KRS

7.136

.

Research References and Practice Aids

Kentucky Law Journal.

Kentucky Law Survey, Mapother, the Constitutionality of Kentucky’s Prejudgment Seizure Law, 68 Ky. L.J. 557 (1979-1980).

Treatises

Caldwell’s Kentucky Form Book, 5th Ed., Practice Context for Injunctions, § 156.00.

425.090.
Exoneration of bail. [Repealed.]

425.091.
Levy on property.

Except as otherwise provided in this section, upon receipt of the writ of possession the levying officer shall search for and take custody of the specified property, if it be in the possession of the defendant or his agent, either by removing the property to a place of safe keeping or upon order of the judicial officer by installing a keeper.

If the specified property is used as a dwelling, levy shall be made by placing a keeper in charge of the property for two (2) days at the plaintiff’s expense, after which period the levying officer shall remove the occupants and any contents not specified in the writ and shall take exclusive possession of the property.

If the specified property or any part of it is in a private place, the levying officer shall at the time he demands possession of the property announce his identity, purpose and authority. If the property is not voluntarily delivered, the levying officer may cause any building or enclosure where the property may be located to be broken open in such a manner as he reasonably believes will cause the least damage and may call upon the power of any other law enforcement officers of the county to aid and protect him, but, if he reasonably believes that entry and seizure of the property will involve a substantial risk of death or serious bodily harm to any person he shall refrain from seizing the property and shall promptly make a return to the court from which the writ issued setting forth the reasons for his belief that the risk exists. In such case, the judicial officer shall make such orders as may be appropriate.

Nothing in this section authorizes the levying officer to enter or search any private place not specified in the writ of possession or other order of the judicial officer.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976, ch. 91, § 18.

Research References and Practice Aids

Kentucky Bench & Bar.

Mapother, Prejudgment Seizure — Practice and Procedure in Kentucky, Vol. 42, No. 3, October 1978, Ky. Bench & Bar 12.

Treatises

Caldwell’s Kentucky Form Book, 5th Ed., Practice Context for Writ of Possession, § 152.00.

Caldwell’s Kentucky Form Book, 5th Ed., Writ of Possession, Form 152.09.

425.095.
Liability of officer as bail — Discharge. [Repealed.]

425.096.
Service of writ and bond by levying officer — Attachment of property removed from the county.

At the time of the levy, the levying officer shall deliver to the person in possession of the property a copy of the writ of possession with a copy of the plaintiff’s bond attached.

If no one is in possession of the property at the time of levy, the levying officer shall subsequently serve the writ and attached bond on the defendant or if he cannot be found the levying officer shall leave the writ and attached bond at the usual place of abode of the person in possession of the property.

If after a writ of possession has been placed in the hands of the sheriff, any property of the defendant be removed from the county the sheriff may pursue and attach it in another county within twenty-four (24) hours after the removal.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976, ch. 91, § 19.

Research References and Practice Aids

Treatises

Caldwell’s Kentucky Form Book, 5th Ed., Practice Context for Writ of Possession, § 152.00.

Caldwell’s Kentucky Form Book, 5th Ed., Writ of Possession, Form 152.09.

425.100.
Fixing and enforcement of officer’s liability as bail. [Repealed.]

425.101.
Delivery of property — Redelivery — Levy upon perishable property — Control of property.

After the levying officer takes possession pursuant to a writ of possession, he shall keep the property in a secure place. Except as otherwise provided by KRS

425.081

:

If bond with sufficient surety for redelivery is not filed and plaintiff’s sureties are not excepted to, the sheriff shall deliver the property to plaintiff ten (10) days after levy of the writ of possession, upon receiving his fees for taking and necessary expenses for keeping the property.

If a bond with sufficient surety is filed within ten (10) days after levy of the writ of possession and defendant’s sureties are not excepted to, the sheriff or plaintiff, if plaintiff holds possession under subsection (3)(a) of this section shall redeliver the property to defendant upon expiration of the time to so except, upon receiving his fees for taking and necessary expenses for keeping the property not already paid or advanced by the plaintiff.

If the plaintiff’s sureties are excepted to, or if a bond for redelivery is filed within ten (10) days after levy of the writ of possession and defendant’s sureties are excepted to, the sheriff shall not deliver or redeliver the property until the time provided in KRS

425.121

.

Notwithstanding subsection (1) of this section, where not otherwise provided by contract, upon a showing that the property is perishable or will greatly deteriorate or depreciate in value or for some other reason that the interests of the parties will best be served thereby, the judicial officer may order that the property be sold and the proceeds deposited in the court to abide the judgment in the action.

If it is impractical, or impossible, for the sheriff to retain possession and control of the property levied upon, he may:

Immediately, upon seizure, place the property in the hands of the plaintiff, who shall be required to keep the property in a secure place and manner within the Commonwealth of Kentucky for the mandatory ten (10) day holding period, subject to all provisions of paragraphs (1)(b) and (c) of this section, excepting those of expenses and fees.

If the property levied upon shall consist of all, or substantially all, of the property within a structure or area, not used as a dwelling, and upon the consent of any third party owner or occupant of the structure or area, levy the writ of possession by securing with locks, or other means, the place or area, and holding the property at the place or area where it is found and levied upon, provided that the defendant shall be afforded a reasonable right of access.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976, ch. 91, § 20; 1980, ch. 188, § 294, effective July 15, 1980; 1984, ch. 158, § 5, effective July 13, 1984.

Research References and Practice Aids

Treatises

Caldwell’s Kentucky Form Book, 5th Ed., Practice Context for Writ of Possession, § 152.00.

Caldwell’s Kentucky Form Book, 5th Ed., Writ of Possession, Form 152.09.

425.105.
Liability of bail to officer. [Repealed.]

425.106.
Return of writ — Procedure when claimed property has been disposed of or concealed.

The levying officer shall return the writ of possession with his proceedings thereon, to the court in which the action is pending within 30 days after levy but in no event more than 60 days after the writ is issued.

If it appears from the return of the writ of possession that the property claimed has been disposed of or concealed so that the writ cannot be executed, the court may compel the attendance of the defendant, examine him on oath as to the situation of the property, and punish a disobedience of its orders in this respect as in cases of contempt.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976, ch. 91, § 21.

425.110.
Proceedings to vacate order of arrest or to reduce bail — Evidence. [Repealed.]

425.111.
Plaintiff’s bond.

The judicial officer shall not issue a temporary restraining order or a writ of possession until the plaintiff has filed with the court a written bond that, if the plaintiff fails to recover judgment in the action, the plaintiff shall return the property to the defendant, if return thereof be ordered, and shall pay all costs that may be awarded to the defendant and all damages referred to in subsection (2), not exceeding the amount of the bond. The bond shall be executed by one (1) or more sufficient sureties in an amount not less than twice the value of the property as determined by the judicial officer. This subsection may be satisfied by the posting of a cash bond.

The damages referred to in subsection (1) are all damages sustained by the defendant which are proximately caused by operation of the temporary restraining order and preliminary injunction, if any, the levy of the writ of possession, and the loss of possession of the property pursuant to levy of the writ of possession or in compliance with an order issued under KRS

425.036

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976, ch. 91, § 22.

Research References and Practice Aids

Kentucky Bench & Bar.

Mapother, Kentucky’s New Prejudgment Seizure Law, Vol. 40, No. 3, July 1976, Ky. Bench & Bar 20.

Kentucky Law Journal.

Kentucky Law Survey, Mapother, the Constitutionality of Kentucky’s Prejudgment Seizure Law, 68 Ky. L.J. 557 (1979-1980).

Treatises

Caldwell’s Kentucky Form Book, 5th Ed., Order Transferring Possession (Another Form), Form 152.11.

Caldwell’s Kentucky Form Book, 5th Ed., Plaintiff’s Bond — No Surety, Form 152.15.

Caldwell’s Kentucky Form Book, 5th Ed., Plaintiff’s Bond on Writ of Possession and Order Transferring Possession, Form 152.14.

Caldwell’s Kentucky Form Book, 5th Ed., Practice Context for Writ of Possession, § 152.00.

Caldwell’s Kentucky Form Book, 5th Ed., Temporary Restraining Order, Form 152.12.

425.115.
Scire facias against bail abolished. [Repealed.]

425.116.
Defendant’s bond.

The defendant or any other person claiming interest in the property, may prevent the plaintiff from taking possession of property pursuant to a writ of possession or regain possession of property so taken by filing with the court in which the action was brought, a written bond executed by one (1) or more sufficient sureties in an amount equal to either the amount of the plaintiff’s bond required by KRS

425.111

or if there has been no judicial determination, the value of the property stated in the plaintiff’s application for a writ of possession. The bond shall state that, if the plaintiff recovers judgment on the action, the defendant shall pay all costs awarded to the plaintiff and all damages that the plaintiff may sustain by reason of the loss of possession of the property, not exceeding the amount of the bond. The damages recoverable by the plaintiff pursuant to this section shall include all damages proximately caused by the plaintiff’s failure to gain or retain possession.

The defendant’s bond may be filed at any time before or after levy of the writ of possession. A copy of the bond shall be mailed to the levying officer and to the plaintiff. A certification stating that such copies have been mailed shall be filed with the court at the time the bond is filed.

The defendant’s bond shall state the address to which a copy of the notice of exception to sureties may be sent.

If an undertaking for redelivery is filed and defendant’s sureties are not excepted to, the levying officer shall deliver the property to the defendant, or, if the plaintiff has previously been given possession of the property, the plaintiff shall deliver such property to the defendant. If a bond for redelivery is filed and defendant’s sureties are excepted to, the provision of KRS

425.101

shall apply.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976, ch. 91, § 23.

425.120.
Plaintiff may claim immediate delivery of property. [Repealed.]

425.121.
Exception to sureties — Effect of failure to justify.

The defendant may except to the plaintiff’s sureties not later than 10 days after levy of the writ of possession by filing with the court in which the action was brought a notice of exception to sureties and mailing a copy of the notice to the levying officer and to the plaintiff. The notice of exception filed with the court shall contain a certification that copies have been mailed to the levying officer and to the plaintiff.

The plaintiff may except to the defendant’s sureties not later than 10 days after the defendant’s bond is filed by filing with the court in which the action was brought a notice of exception to sureties and mailing a copy of the notice to the levying officer and to the defendant at the address set out in his bond. The notice of exception filed with the court shall contain a certification that copies have been mailed to the levying officer.

If the plaintiff or the defendant does not except to the sureties of the other as provided in this section he waives all objection to them.

When excepted to, the sureties shall justify that they are sufficient before a judicial officer of the court in which the action was brought at a time specified by the excepting party and in compliance with the rules of procedure.

If the plaintiff’s sureties, or others in their place, fail to justify at the time and place appointed or do not qualify, the judicial officer shall vacate the temporary restraining order or preliminary injunction, if any, and the writ of possession and, if levy has occurred, order the levying officer to return the property to the defendant. If the plaintiff’s sureties do qualify the judicial officer shall order the levying officer to deliver the property to the plaintiff.

If the defendant’s sureties or others in their place fail to justify at the time and place appointed or do not qualify, the judicial officer shall order the levying officer to deliver the property to the plaintiff, or if the plaintiff has previously been given possession of the property he shall retain such possession. If the defendant’s sureties do qualify, the judicial officer shall order the levying officer or the plaintiff to deliver the property to the defendant.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976, ch. 91, § 24.

Research References and Practice Aids

Treatises

Caldwell’s Kentucky Form Book, 5th Ed., Practice Context for Trespass to Chattel, § 126.00.

Caldwell’s Kentucky Form Book, 5th Ed., Writ of Attachment — Personal Property, Form 150.09.

Caldwell’s Kentucky Form Book, 5th Ed., Writ of Attachment — Real Property, Form 150.08.

425.125.
Clerk to make order of delivery — Required contents of affidavit. [Repealed.]

425.126.
Execution on transferable securities, security entitlements, or an option or right to acquire a security — Requirements of the order — Duty of corporate officials.

If any claim be made by attachment, garnishment, or other judicial order to a security or security entitlement, as defined in KRS

355.8-102

(1), such order shall not be valid as against any securities intermediary, as defined in KRS

355.8-102

(1), or any issuer, as defined in KRS

355.8-201

, or nominee or agent of either having any interest in, custody of, or control over such security or security entitlement, unless such order specifies the following:

For a security, the name of the issuer, the class or series of the security, or both, the number of shares or other units of interest represented by the security, the name of the debtor and the name of the person, if different from the debtor, having an account on the books of the securities intermediary or issuer in which such security is shown;

For an option or right to acquire a security, the name of the issuer, the class or series of the security in which the option or right to acquire exists, the name of the debtor and the name of the person, if different from the debtor, having an account on the books of the securities intermediary or issuer in which such option or right is shown; or

For a security entitlement, other than a security or an option or right to acquire a security, the name of the debtor and the name of the person, if different from the debtor, having an account on the books of the securities intermediary or issuer in which such security entitlement is shown.

An attachment, garnishment, or other judicial order of the kind described in subsection (1) of this section which does not set forth all the elements of identification required by subsection (1) of this section shall in no manner bind or give notice of such claim to any securities intermediary, as defined in KRS

355.8-102

(1), or any issuer, as defined in KRS

355.8-201

, or nominee or agent of either having an interest in, custody of, or control over such security, or option or right to acquire such security, or security entitlement, and such securities intermediary, issuer, nominee, or agent may transfer, pledge, or in any manner deal with such security or option, or right to acquire such security or security entitlement in disregard of such order or claim without liability to the claimant.

It shall be the duty of every person mentioned in subsections (1) and (2) of this section to whom any plaintiff or any judgment creditor shall apply therefor, in good faith and for a proper purpose stated in the request, to furnish him or her a written statement setting forth any reasonably requested information in such person’s possession, custody, or control that concerns the ownership of or records concerning ownership of a security, an option or right to acquire a security, or a security entitlement concerning a specifically identified person. The statement shall be provided within ten (10) days of receipt of the written request and a failure to perform this duty may be punished by the court as a contempt.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976, ch. 91, § 25; 2010, ch. 155, § 4, effective July 15, 2010.

425.130.
Order of delivery — When returnable. [Repealed.]

425.135.
Bond required of plaintiff — Claimant entitled to benefit. [Repealed.]

425.140.
Form of bond in action against officer. [Repealed.]

425.145.
Execution of order. [Repealed.]

425.150.
Disposition of property taken by sheriff. [Repealed.]

425.155.
Defendant may retain property by executing bond. [Repealed.]

425.160.
When property to be appraised. [Repealed.]

425.165.
Sheriff allowed expenses for keeping property. [Repealed.]

425.170.
Proceedings if stranger claims property. [Repealed.]

425.175.
Orders may be directed to any county. [Repealed.]

425.180.
Proceedings for discovery of property. [Repealed.]

425.185.
Grounds of attachment in action for recovery of money or property — Procedure for earnings. [Repealed.]

425.190.
Proceedings for obtaining order of garnishment. [Repealed.]

425.195.
Clerk to issue order of attachment — Required averments of affidavit. [Repealed.]

425.200.
When affidavit need not aver defendant’s avoidance of service. [Repealed.]

425.205.
Bond required before issual of order — Form. [Repealed.]

425.210.
Orders of attachment or garnishment of earnings — Priority — Form. [Repealed.]

425.211.
Form of order — Answer. [Repealed.]

425.215.
Order of attachment may issue to any county — Costs. [Repealed.]

425.220.
Precedence of orders. [Repealed.]

425.225.
Execution of order. [Repealed.]

425.230.
Duty of officer on whom order executed — Penalty. [Repealed.]

425.235.
Duty of garnishee — Penalty. [Repealed.]

425.240.
Personal property to be first taken. [Repealed.]

425.245.
Attachment of fund in court. [Repealed.]

425.250.
Attachment of joint property — Bond. [Repealed.]

425.255.
Attachment of joint property in action against joint debtors. [Repealed.]

425.260.
Procedure where attachments are pending in different court. [Repealed.]

425.265.
Officer may require execution of indemnity bond. [Repealed.]

425.270.
Lien of attachment. [Repealed.]

425.275.
Sheriff may pursue and attach property in another county. [Repealed.]

425.280.
Possessor may retain property by executing bond — Appraisement — Defense not allowed. [Repealed.]

425.285.
Form of sheriff’s return. [Repealed.]

425.290.
Preservation, use or sale of attached property. [Repealed.]

425.295.
Expenses allowed for keeping property — Allowances for keeping steamboat. [Repealed.]

425.300.
Proceedings to compel the giving of information concerning attached property. [Repealed.]